Hawaii statutes.
[§420D-6] Standard of conduct for
directors. (a) In discharging the duties of their respective positions,
the board of directors, committees of the board, and individual directors of a
sustainable business corporation, in considering the best interests of the
sustainable business corporation:

(1) Shall consider the effects of any action of the
sustainable business corporation upon:

(A) The shareholders of the sustainable
business corporation; and

(B) The accomplishment of general and
specific public benefits set forth in the sustainable business corporation's
purposes; and

(2) May consider:

(A) The employees and workforce of the
sustainable business corporation and its subsidiaries and suppliers;

(B) The interests of customers as
beneficiaries of the general or specific public benefit purposes of the
sustainable business corporation;

(C) Community and societal considerations,
including those of any community in which offices or facilities of the
sustainable business corporation or its subsidiaries or suppliers are located;

(D) The local and global environment;

(E) The short-term and long-term interests of
the sustainable business corporation, including benefits that may accrue to the
sustainable business corporation from its long-term plans and the possibility
that these interests may be best served by the continued independence of the
sustainable business corporation;

(F) The ability of the sustainable business
corporation to accomplish its general public benefit purpose and any specific
public benefit purpose;

(G) The resources, intent, and conduct of any
person seeking to acquire control of the corporation; and

(H) Any other pertinent factors or the
interests of any other group that they deem appropriate.

(b) A director shall not be personally liable
for monetary damages for any action taken as a director if the director
performed the duties of the director's office in compliance with the general
standards of conduct pursuant to section 414-221. [L 2011, c 209, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next